Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 6.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201283-917
Reentry Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

The Reentry
Cash Fund is created. The fund shall be administered by the Department of
Correctional Services. The State Treasurer shall credit funds remitted pursuant
to sections 33-157 and 83-184 and donations or contributions from public or
private sources to the Reentry Cash Fund. The fund shall be used by the department
for tuition, fees, and other costs associated with reentry and reintegration
programs offered to offenders that are placed in the incarceration work camp.
Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state
investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the
Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2010, LB510, § 6.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.